Louisiana, session 2026, HB947.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 9:183 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
PART I. UNCLAIMED DIGITAL ASSETS
§183. Definitions
As used in this Part, the following terms have the meaning ascribed in this
Section:
(1) "Administrator" means the state treasurer.
(2) "Airdrop" means the issuance of a unit of a digital asset that is distributed
in a broad, equitable, and nondiscretionary manner based on conditions that are
capable of being satisfied by a participant in a blockchain system as incentive-based
rewards, including any of the following:
Page 1 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-994 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 947
(a) Distribution to users of a digital asset or of any blockchain system to
which that digital asset relates.
(b) Distribution for activities that are directly related to the operation of the
blockchain system, including mining, validating, staking, or any other activity
directly tied to the operation of the blockchain system.
(c) Distribution to existing holders of another digital asset in proportion to
the total units of that other digital asset held by each person.
(d) "Airdrop" does not include an exchange of more than a nominal value of
cash, property, or other assets.
(3) "Digital asset" means virtual currencies, cryptocurrencies, and other
digital-only assets that confer economic, proprietary, or access rights or powers.
(4) "Digital asset account" means a customer account, wallet, or other
repository maintained by an owner with a holder that may contain one or more types
of digital assets, fiat currency, or other property.
(5) "Private key" means a unique element of cryptographic data used for
signing transactions on a blockchain that is known to the owner of the element.
(6) "Qualified custodian" means any of the following:
(a) A company possessing a license granted by this state that sells digital
assets to customers and offers custody services for digital assets.
(b) A federal or state chartered bank, trust company, or special purpose
depository institution that is licensed or authorized to sell digital assets or offer
custody services for digital assets.
§184. Presumption of abandonment of digital asset accounts; exercise of ownership
interest; delivery
A. Property held within a digital asset account is presumed abandoned three
years after any of the following events:
(1) The date a written or electronic communication to the owner is returned
as undelivered by the United States Postal Service or by electronic mail or other
electronic messaging method, as applicable.
Page 2 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-994 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 947
(2) If the owner does not receive written or electronic communications from
the holder, or the holder does not have the means of systematically tracking or
monitoring the nondelivery of such communications, the date of the last exercise of
an act of ownership interest by the owner in the digital asset account.
B. The running of the period of abandonment provided in Subsection A of
this Section ceases upon the exercise of an act of ownership interest in the digital
asset account or a written, oral, or electronic communication with the holder as
evidenced by a memorandum or other record on file with the holder or its agent.
C. For purposes of this Section, an "exercise of an act of ownership interest"
includes but is not limited to any of the following actions by the owner regarding the
digital asset account:
(1) Conducting a transaction involving the digital asset account, including
buying or selling digital assets, or depositing into or withdrawing from the account
fiat currency or other property, whether by a one-time transaction or a recurring
transaction previously authorized by the owner.
(2) Accessing the digital asset account electronically.
(3) Conducting any activity with respect to another digital asset account or
any other property owned by the owner and held by the same holder.
(4) Taking any other action that reasonably demonstrates to the holder that
the owner is aware of the existence of the property.
D.(1) If a digital asset account that is presumed abandoned as provided in this
Section contains digital assets and the holder has full control of the necessary private
keys required to transfer those digital assets, the holder shall report and deliver the
digital assets in their native form to the qualified custodian designated by the
administrator under R.S. 9:185 no later than thirty days after reporting. Placement
of the digital assets with the qualified custodian designated by the administrator
constitutes delivery under the applicable provisions of this Part.
(2) The holder shall provide the administrator with proof of delivery upon
request.
Page 3 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-994 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 947
(3) If the holder possesses only a partial private key to the digital asset or is
otherwise unable to transfer the digital asset to the qualified custodian designated by
the administrator, the holder shall maintain the digital asset until the additional keys
required to transfer the digital asset become available or the holder is otherwise able
to transfer the digital asset to the qualified custodian designated by the administrator.
E. If the administrator determines that a reported digital asset cannot be
accepted for custody by the qualified custodian designated by the administrator, or
that the cost of custody and administration of the digital asset exceeds the value of
the digital asset, the administrator may direct the holder to sell or otherwise liquidate
the digital asset and deliver the net proceeds as instructed by the administrator.
F.(1) The qualified custodian shall maintain digital assets in their native form
for a minimum period of three years before arranging for the sale of the property, in
order to enable owners to make claims to the assets on a pre-sale basis.
(2) If an owner makes a claim to digital assets still held by the qualified
custodian in their native form, the administrator shall cooperate with the owner to
transfer the property to a custodian selected by the owner.
G. After the completion of the three-year holding period provided in
Subsection F of this Section, the administrator may liquidate digital assets received
under this Section in accordance with the rules governing the liquidation of securities
under the applicable provisions of this Chapter; however, no liquidation shall occur
prior to the expiration of the holding period provided in Subsection F of this Section.
Nothing in this Subsection shall be construed to require liquidation upon the
conclusion of that period.
H.(1) The qualified custodian shall not liquidate a digital asset for less than
the prevailing market price at the time of sale.
(2) If a digital asset does not have a prevailing market price or the qualified
custodian does not have a means of determining the prevailing market price, the
qualified custodian may sell the digital asset by any commercially reasonable
method.
Page 4 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-994 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 947
§185. Selection of qualified custodian
A. The administrator shall select a qualified custodian for the management
and safekeeping of digital assets presumed abandoned and held under this Part not
later than one year after the effective date of this Part.
B. The administrator shall select a qualified custodian based on an evaluation
of all of the following criteria:
(1) Secure storage solutions to ensure the safekeeping of digital assets,
including robust cybersecurity measures to prevent unauthorized access.
(2) Capability to manage private keys associated with digital assets and the
ability to transfer or transact with the assets when required.
(3) Proven experience in handling digital assets.
(4) Compliance with all applicable federal and state regulations related to
digital asset custody.
(5) Regular reporting mechanisms to the administrator regarding the status
and value of the digital assets under custody.
(6) Processes to reunite owners with their digital assets, including
maintaining updated contact records and issuing timely notifications.
(7) Qualification as a "financial institution" under 31 CFR Chapter X, which
subjects the qualified custodian to the anti-money laundering obligations of the
federal Bank Secrecy Act, in addition to any state-imposed anti-money laundering
obligations.
(8) Any other factors the administrator deems relevant.
C. The qualified custodian selected through the process provided in this
Section shall enter into a formal agreement with the administrator. The agreement
shall specify the qualified custodian's duties, obligations, and compensation, as well
as terms governing termination of the agreement and auditing rights of the state.
§186. Earnings and airdrops
A. All rewards, interest, airdropped assets, and similar earnings received
accrue to the unclaimed property fund. Such funds shall be designated for the
Page 5 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-994 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 947
administration, custody, and disposition of digital assets under this Part and shall not
be commingled with or used for other purposes of the unclaimed property fund.
B. The administrator shall submit an annual report to the legislature at least
thirty days prior to each regular session detailing proceeds received pursuant to this
Part, including the total value accrued from airdrops, interest, and other rewards, as
well as the total amount expended for the administration of the digital asset program
provided by this Part.
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.